District of Columbia statutes.
13-301

Courts to which applicable.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or rules of court, this chapter applies to the District of Columbia courts.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 513, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 142(2)
1981 Ed., § 13-301.
1973 Ed., § 13-301.